Hawaii statutes.
§607-6 Appellate court costs. (a) All
proceedings in the courts of appeal shall be filed in the office of the clerk
of the supreme court. Upon the filing of any appeal or the institution of any
original suit, action, or other proceeding in the supreme court or the
intermediate appellate court, there shall be paid by the person filing such
appeal, or instituting the suit, action, or other proceeding, as appellate
court costs, the sum of $100. For purposes of this section, applications for
transfer and applications for writs of certiorari to the intermediate appellate
court shall not be deemed other proceedings.

(b) In addition to the costs of court
enumerated in subsection (a), the clerk of the supreme court shall charge and
collect, for miscellaneous services performed by the clerk, the following sums:

(1) For filing any paper
not in a pending suit, action, or other proceeding... $3

(2) For issuing any
subpoena, for each witness to be served............. $3

(3) All amounts necessary
to cover actual costs or disbursements for printing, publishing, or posting
notice, service fees, mileage charges, or other services actually performed.
[RL 1935, pt of §3791; am L 1939, c 19, pt of §1; am L 1941, c 229, pt of §1;
RL 1945, §9746; RL 1955, §219-6; am L 1957, c 316, §23; HRS §607-6; am L 1972,
c 88, §5(k); am L 1974, c 145, §8; am L 1979, c 111, §5(2); gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 44, §1; am L 1998, c 128, §4; am L 2004, c 3, §2 and c 202, §64; am L
2006, c 94, §1; am L 2010, c 109, §1]

Rules of Court

Costs, see HRAP rules 39, 45(e).

Case Notes

Filing of bond to cover further cost must be in time. 5 H.
591 (1886).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next